en: brown beans
da: brune bønner
de: braune Bohnen
es: habichuela parda
fi: ruskea papu, ruskeat pavut
fr: haricots bruns
hr: smeđi grah
it: fagioli marroni
nb: brune bønner
nl: bruine bonen

en: flageolets, flageolet beans
de: Flageolette
es: habichuelas
fi: leikkopapu, leikkopavut
fr: flageolets
hr: flažoleti
it: flageolets

en: green flageolets
de: Grüne Bohnenkerne
fi: vihreä leikkopapu, vihreät leikkopavut
fr: flageolets verts
hr: zelene flažolete
it: fagioli nani
nl: groene flageolets

fr: flageolets verts extra-fins
nl: extra fijne groene flageolets

en: hyacinth bean, lablab beans, dolichos beans, Egyptian beans, safed val, sem
la: Lablab purpureus

en: lupin bean, lupine bean, lupin, lupines, lupine, sweet lupin, lupini, lupini beans
ar: ترمس
az: Acıpaxla
ba: әсе борсаҡ
be: лубін
bg: лупина
bn: লুপিন
cs: vlčí bob, lupina
da: lupin
de: Lupinensamen, Lupinen, Lupine
el: λούπινο, λούπινα
eo: lupenoj
es: altramuz, altramuces
et: lupiin
fi: lupiinit, lupiini
fr: lupin, lupins, lupin doux, lupins doux
ga: lúipín
he: תורמוס
hr: lupin, lupina, lupinu
hu: csillagfürt, csillagfürt bab
hy: լուպին
id: lupino
is: úlfabaunir
it: lupini, lupino
ja: ルピナス属
ka: ხანჭკოლა
kk: люпин
ky: люпин
la: lupinus
lt: lubinai, lubinas
lv: lupīna, lupīnas
mk: волчјак
mn: шошлой
mt: lupina, lupin
nb: lupin
nl: lupine
nn: lupin
os: бирæгъхъæдур
pl: łubin, łubinu
pt: tremoço, tremoços
qu: q'ira
ro: lupin
ru: люпин
sd: چونرا
se: lupiidnat
sk: vlčí bôb, lupina
sl: volčji, volčji bob
sv: lupin
sw: mlupini
th: ลูพิน
tr: acı bakla
uk: люпин
zh: 羽扇豆, 鲁冰花

en: white lupin, white lupine
fr: lupin blanc, lupin blanc doux
hr: bijela lupina
hu: fehér csillagfürt
it: lupino bianco
la: lupinus albus

en: blue lupin, blue lupine
fr: lupin bleu, lupin bleu doux
hr: plava lupina
hu: kék csillagfürt
it: lupino blu
la: lupinus angustifolius

en: yellow lupin, yellow lupine
fr: lupin jaune, lupin jaune doux
hr: žuta lupina
hu: sárga csillagfürt
it: lupino giallo
la: lupinus luteus

en: lupin grit
fr: grains de lupin, grain de lupin, graines de lupin, graine de lupin
hr: lupinov grit
it: granella di lupini
nl: lupinegrut

en: lupin flour, lupine flour
bg: брашно от лупина
cs: mouka z vičího bobu
de: Lupinenmehl, Süßlupinenmehl, Süsslupinenmehl
es: harina de altramuz
fi: lupiinijauho
fr: farine de lupin
hr: brašno od lupine
hu: csillagfürtliszt
it: farina di lupino
nl: lupinemeel

fr: vermicelle de pois
nl: vermicelli van erwten

fr: vermicelle de pois réhydraté, vermicelles de pois réhydratés
nl: gerehydrateerde vermicelli van erwten

en: moth bean, matki, mothbean, turkish gram, dew bean
la: Vigna aconitifolia

en: broad bean, fava bean, faba bean, Vicia faba, horse bean, broadbean
am: ባቄላ
ar: فول
ay: Jawasa
az: At paxlası
be: боб
bg: бакла
ca: fava
cs: bob obecný
cy: Ffeuen y gerddi
da: Hestebønne
de: Ackerbohne, Ackerbohnen, Fava Bohnen, Saubohne
el: Κουκιά
eo: Fabo
es: haba, habas, habas tiernas
et: Põlduba
eu: Baba
fa: باقلا
fi: Härkäpapu
fr: fève, fèves, féverole, féverolle
ga: Pónaire leathan
gl: Faballón
he: פול
hi: बकला
hr: bob
hu: lóbab, holdbab
hy: Բակլա
id: Kara oncet
io: Fabo
is: Bóndabaunir
it: fave, fagiolo
ja: ソラマメ
ka: ცერცვი
kk: Ат бұршақ
ko: 누에콩
ku: Keşol
la: Vicia faba
lv: lauka pupa
mk: бакла
ml: അവര
ms: Kacang parang
nb: Hestebønne
ne: बकुल्ला सिमी
nl: tuinboon, tuinbonen
nn: Hestebønne
oc: Fava
os: Бæхы хъæдур
pl: Bób, bobu
pt: Fava
qu: Chaqullu
ro: Bob
ru: боб садовый
sa: वर्तुलकम्
sc: Fae
sh: Bob
sl: bob
sq: Bathët
sr: боб
sv: bondböna, bondbönor, favaböna, favabönor
sw: Mharagwe-pana
te: అనపకాయ
tg: Боқило
th: ถั่วปากอ้า
tr: Bakla
uk: біб кінський
uz: Boqla
vi: Đậu răng ngựa
wa: Grosse feve
zh: 蚕豆

en: dried broad bean
fr: fève sêche, fèves sèches
it: fava secca

en: faba bean preparation
it: preparato con fave
nl: bereiding van tuinbonen

en: Fresh broad bean to shell
fr: Fèves fraîches à écosser
it: fave fresche da sgusciare

en: meat bean, bean of Bresse, Chartreuse and Oisan bean
fr: haricot viande, haricots viande, haricot de Bresse, haricot de Chartreuse et d'Oisan
hu: húsbab
it: fagiolo di carne

en: Adzuki bean, azuki bean
ar: لوبياء مقرنة
ca: mongeta azuki
cs: vigna hranatá
de: Adzukibohne
eo: Azukio
eu: azuki
fa: لوبیای آزوکی
fi: Adsukipapu
fr: haricot azuki, haricots azuki
he: אזוקי
hr: adzuki grah
hu: Azukibab, Adzuki bab
id: Kacang azuki
it: fagiolo azuki, fagioli azuki
ja: アズキ, 小豆
ko: 팥
la: vigna angularis
lt: Japoninė pupuolė
ms: Kacang merah
nl: adukiboon
pl: fasola adzuki
ru: Адзуки
sr: Азуки пасуљ
sv: Adzukiböna
sw: Muazuki
th: ถั่วอาซูกิ
uk: Адзукі
vi: Đậu đỏ
za: Lwglimz
zh: 紅豆